tokenize.xfst
! tokenize.xfst
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!
!

! This FST is a *very* simple tokenizer that splits given input to
! tokens and sentences. 



! White space
define WS " "|"\u0009"|"\u000a"|"\u000d"|
          "\u00a0"|"\u1680"|
          "\u2000"|"\u2001"|"\u2002"|"\u2003"|"\u2004"|"\u2005"| 
          "\u2006"|"\u2007"|"\u2008"|"\u2009"|"\u200a"|
          "\u2028"|"\u2029"|"\u202f"|"\u205f"|"\u3000";

! Punctuation that ends sentences
define SP "..."|"."|"?"|"!"|"…";

! Left punctuation
define LP   "("|"["|"{"|
            "“"|"‘"|"‹"|"«"|
            "'"|%"|"''";

! Right punctuation - excluding the characters that can be used as apostrophe
define RP   SP|","|";"|":"|
            ")"|"]"|"{"|
            "”"|"›"|"»"|
            %"|"''";


define Sym "-"|"+"|"<"|">"|"*"|"/";

define Punct LP|RP|Sym;

define Apos %'|%’;

!define TB "\u000a";
!define SB "\u000a\u000a";

define TB "<tb>";
define SB "<sb>";

define Digit [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define define CAP [A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â|X|W|Q];
define define LC [a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|ğ|h|i|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|ö|p|r|s|ş|t|u|ü|v|y|z|î|û|â|x|w|q];


define nonSym \[WS|LP|RP|Sym];

define Word nonSym+ [(["."|"-"|Apos] nonSym+)*];
define Initial  \[WS|LP|RP|Sym] ".";
define Number Digit+ [([%.|%,] Digit+)*];

define Abbr @txt"abbr.txt";

define T    [Word|Punct|Initial|Number] @-> ... TB 
        .o. Apos @-> TB ... || _ TB
        .o. TB -> SB || [SP|.#.] _ 
        .o. SB -> TB || [Abbr|Digit+] SP _
        .o. SB -> TB || LP .* SP _ RP 
        .o. WS+ -> 0
        .o. TB -> " "
        .o. SB -> "\u000a";

regex T.i;

save stack tokenize.fst
